pt-PT: design da haste do dardo: Fixo/bloqueado; Voo e haste integrados; Topo rotativo; Giratório; Telescópico; Outro
nb: Dartskaftdesign: Fast/låst; Integrert flight og skaft; Roterende topp; Roterende; Teleskopisk; Annet
ja: ダーツシャフトのデザイン: 固定/ロック式; フライト・シャフト一体型; 回転トップ; スピン式; 伸縮式; その他
ro-RO: Designul ax dart: Fix/blocat; Aripioară și tijă integrate; Partea superioară rotativă; Rotativ; Telescopic; Altele
nl: Dartshaft ontwerp: Vast/vergrendeld; Geïntegreerde flight en shaft; Draaiende top; Draaiend; Telescopisch; Overige
zh-TW: 飛鏢鏢桿設計: 固定/鎖定; 一體成型尾翼與鏢桿; 旋轉頂部; 旋轉; 伸縮; 其他
en: Dart shaft design: Fixed/locked; Integrated flight & shaft; Rotating top; Spinning; Telescopic; Other
bg-BG: Дизайн на опашката на стреличката за дартс: Фиксирано/заключено; Интегрирано перо и рамо; Въртящ се връх; Въртящо се; Телескопично; Други
el: Σχεδιασμός άξονα βέλους: Σταθερό/κλειδωμένο; Ενσωματωμένο φτερό & άξονας; Περιστρεφόμενο επάνω μέρος; Περιστρεφόμενο; Τηλεσκοπικό; Άλλο
fr: Type de tige de fléchette: Fixe/verrouillé; Ailette et tige intégrées; Tête rotative; Rotatif; Télescopique; Autre
sl-SI: Zasnova osi za pikado puščico: Fiksno/zaklenjeno; Integrirana peresce in steblo; Vrtljiv vrh; Vrtljivo; Teleskopsko; Drugo
fi: Tikan varren muotoilu: Kiinteä/lukittu; Integroitu sulka ja varsi; Pyörivä yläosa; Pyörivä; Teleskooppinen; Muu
pl: Konstrukcja shaftu lotki: Stały/zablokowany; Zintegrowane piórko i nasadka; Obrotowa nasadka; Obrotowe; Teleskopowe; Inne
hr-HR: Dizajn osovine strelice: Fiksno/zaključano; Integrirano krilce i tijelo; Rotirajući vrh; Rotirajuće; Teleskopsko; Ostalo
it: Design dell'asta della freccia: Fisso/bloccato; Aletta e terminale integrati; Parte superiore rotante; Girevole; Telescopico; Altro
da: Dartpilskaftets design: Fast/låst; Integreret flight og skaft; Roterende top; Roterende; Teleskopisk; Andet
tr: Dart şaftı tasarımı: Sabit/kilitli; Entegre tüy ve şaft; Dönen üst kısım; Dönen; Teleskopik; Diğer
sv: Design av dartskaft: Fast/låst; Integrerad flight och skaft; Roterande topp; Snurrande; Teleskopisk; Övrigt
de: Design des Dartschafts: Fixiert/gesperrt; Integrierter Flight & Schaft; Rotierendes Oberteil; Drehend; Teleskopisch; Sonstige
ko: 다트 샤프트 설계: 고정/잠금; 일체형 플라이트 및 샤프트; 회전형 탑; 스피닝; 텔레스코픽; 기타
pt-BR: Design da haste do dardo: Fixo/bloqueado; Aleta e haste integradas; Topo giratório; Giratório; Telescópico; Outro
th: การออกแบบก้านลูกดอก: แบบตายตัว/ล็อก; ก้านและใบดอกในตัว; ส่วนบนหมุนได้; แบบหมุน; ยืดหดได้; อื่นๆ
es: Diseño del eje del dardo: Fijo/bloqueado; Pluma y caña integradas; Parte superior giratoria; Giratorio; Telescópico; Otro
zh-CN: 镖轴设计设计: 固定/锁定; 镖翼镖杆一体式; 旋转顶部; 旋转; 伸缩; 其他
ru: Конструкция хвостовика дротика: Фиксированный/с блокировкой; Интегрированное оперение и хвостовик; Вращающаяся верхняя часть; Вращающийся; Телескопический; Другое
lt-LT: Smiginio strėlytės kotelio konstrukcija: Fiksuotas / užrakintas; Integruota plunksna ir kotelis; Besisukanti viršutinė dalis; Besisukantis; Teleskopinis; Kita
cs: Design násadky šipky: Pevná/uzamčená; Integrovaná letka a násadka; Otočná horní část; Rotující; Teleskopická; Jiné
vi: Thiết kế trục phi tiêu: Cố định/khóa; Thân và đuôi tích hợp; Đầu có thể xoay; Có thể quay; Có thể thu gọn; Khác
sk-SK: Dizajn drieku šípky: Pevný/uzamknutý; Integrovaná letka a násadka; Otočný vrch; Rotačný; Teleskopický; Iné
hu: Darts nyíl szárának kialakítása: Rögzített/zárt; Integrált toll és szár; Forgó felsőrész; Forgó; Teleszkópos; Egyéb